Wisconsin, session 2025, SB573.
do enact as follows:SB573,13Section 1. 563.03 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB573,2,134563.03 (1m) “Bingo” means a game of chance in which players pay a 1consideration in order to participate, in which 75 numbered objects are available for 2selection, and those objects actually selected are selected on a random basis, and in 3which each player participates by means of cards sold, rented or used only at the 4time and place of the game, each card containing 5 rows of 5 spaces each, each space 5printed with a number from 1 to 75, except the central space, which is marked 6“FREE”. Winners are determined and prizes awarded on the basis of possessing a 7bingo card on which some combination of numbers are printed and conform to the 8numbered objects selected at random based on a predetermined winning 9arrangement. “Bingo” as used in this chapter shall not mean any does not include 10a game using free cards and donated prizes, if any, for which no payment of 11consideration is made by participants, regardless of whether the host or sponsor of 12the game pays consideration to another person in exchange for the prizes, supplies, 13equipment, or logistical support for the game.SB573,2,1414